Hawaii statutes.
§467B-1.5 Professional solicitors; required disclosures. (a)
Every professional solicitor, and every employee or agent thereof, who solicits
contributions from a prospective donor or contributor in this State shall at
the outset of any oral or written request for a contribution:

(1) Identify themselves by their true surname and
first name, and the name of their employer or the contractor as the case may
be, that is compensating the individual making the solicitation;

(2) Identify the name of the professional solicitor
registered with the department of the attorney general that has contracted with
the charitable organization to provide the solicitation services and, if the
individual is employed by a subcontractor, the name of the registered subcontractor;

(3) Disclose that the person making the oral or
written request for a donation is being paid to make such solicitation and the
name of the charitable organization on whose behalf the person making the
request is soliciting; and

(4) Disclose, orally and in writing, the fact that a
copy of the professional solicitor's registration data and financial reports
are available from the department of the attorney general.

(b) A professional solicitor who makes an oral
solicitation by telephone, door-to-door, or otherwise, prior to collecting or
attempting to collect any contribution, shall provide a written confirmation of
the expected contribution and clearly disclose that the contribution is not
tax-deductible, if applicable, or, if the professional solicitor maintains that
the contribution is tax-deductible in whole or in part, the portion of the
contribution that the professional solicitor maintains is tax-deductible. The
written confirmation shall also conspicuously disclose the name and current
address of the registered professional solicitor. [L 2006, c 168, §1; am L
2016, c 163, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next